Hawaii, session 2026, GM1308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the Waiakea
peninsula, which includes Banyan Drive and was historically
known as Makaoku, is an area of significant cultural and
historical importance to the island of Hawaii. Its strategic
location near Hilo town and the sites of the Merrie Monarch
Festival make it a primary center for community activities and
tourism that supports the State's cultural identity and economy.
However, the legislature finds that the area currently requires
focused revitalization to address conditions of blight. Issues
such as a lack of adequate cultural stewardship, public safety,
the declining health of historic banyan trees, poor lighting,
and a substandard pedestrian experience have hindered the area's
potential and diminished its value to the community.
To address these challenges, the legislature determines
that regaining state control over lands within the district in
the near term is essential for successful renewal. By
establishing a community development district under the
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx
iHiiiiiinHMiiiifflMiiimi

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
jurisdiction of the Hawaii community development authority, the
area can be revitalized in a way that fosters cultural
enrichment and enables cultural activities, events, and uses to
coexist effectively with standalone hotel, commercial, and
public uses. This transformation will include the development
of cultural and public facilities, including recreational,
educational, and entertainment spaces that enhance the
experience for residents and visitors.
The legislature further finds that the ongoing oversight,
regulation, and maintenance of the district require a stable and
dedicated financial framework. Because the costs of providing
these services and maintaining the district's infrastructure may
vary from year to year, the general fund appropriation process
may not be sufficient to ensure long-term success.
Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Establish the Banyan Drive community development
district; and
(2) Establish a special fund to provide the Hawaii
community development authority with the consistent
resources necessary to improve and safeguard the
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx 2
lililllllBIlillHIIDIIIIIIliin

Page 3 2001
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
cultural, economic, and social value of this vital
area.
SECTION 2, Chapter 206E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and
to read as follows:
"FART BANTAN DRIVE COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT
§206E- Definitions. As used in this part:
"District" means the Banyan Drive community development
district.
"Fund" means the Banyan Drive community development
district special fund.
§206E- District established; boundaries. The Banyan
Drive community development district is established. The
district shall include all lands makai of the following areas:
(1) The western boundary is the Wailoa river;
(2) The southern boundary begins at the Wailoa river and
follows Kamehameha avenue to its intersection with
Kalanianaole street and then follows Kalanianaole
street to Banyan way; and
(3) The eastern boundary is Reeds bay.
2026-2515 SB2001 CDl SMA-l.docx 3
IIIIIIIIIIIIIOMIIIIIIHiltlinilll

S.B. NO. ™

C.D. 1
The district shall also include Moku Ola, also known as Coconut
island on the north, and rights-of-ways.
§206E- Development guidance policies. (a) The
following general development guidance policies shall govern the
authority's actions in the district:
(1) Development shall seek to promote cultural activities,
provide community facilities, and foster sustainable
economic growth by encouraging diverse land uses and
private sector investments;
(2) Hawaiian archaeological, historic, and cultural sites
shall be preserved and protected;
(3) Land use and redevelopment activities within the
district shall be coordinated with and, to the extent
possible, complement existing state and county
policies, plans, and programs affecting the district;
(4) Public facilities within the district shall be
planned, located, and developed so as to support the
redevelopment policies for the district established by
this part and plans and rules adopted pursuant to this
part;
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx
lllllllllll■lilllOlllllllllllllllilJI

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(5) Development shall consider the impacts of climate
change, sea level rise, inundation risk, and
climate-resilient development in the design and siting
of buildings; and
S (6) Development shall consider the inclusion of mobility
solutions.
(b) The authority may engage in planning, design, and
construction activities within and outside the district;
provided that activities outside the district shall relate to
infrastructure development, area-wide drainage improvements,
roadway realignments and improvements, business and industrial
relocation, and any other activities the authority deems
necessary to carry out redevelopment of the district and
implement this part. Studies or coordinating activities may be
undertaken by the authority in conjunction with the county and
appropriate state agencies and may address, without limitation,
facility systems, industrial relocation, and other activities.
§2061!- Federal government; financial aid; contracts.
(a) The authority may secure financial aid from the federal
government for any planning, design, development, construction.
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx 5
iniiMniiiiiiiiiiiHiiiniHi

Page 6
S.B. NO. 22*1
C.D. 1
and maintenance work that the authority is authorized to
undertake pursuant to this part.
(b) Supplemental to the powers granted to the authority
under section 206E-4, the authority may also:
(1) Borrow moneys or accept grants from the federal
government in aid of or for any development project
the authority is authorized to undertake pursuant to
this part;
(2) Issue bonds or other evidence of indebtedness and
pledge revenues and other assets as security for
indebtedness incurred pursuant to this part;
(3) Repay any indebtedness, including any interest
incurred thereon by the authority pursuant to this
part;
(4) Procure insurance or loan guarantees from the federal
government for the payment of any debts or parts
thereof secured by mortgages made or held by the
authority;
(5) Execute contracts with the federal government in
accordance with this part; and
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx 6
lllllillllHIHIIIIilllllllinO

Page 7 S.B. NO. S?,
C.D, 1
(6) Comply with terms and conditions required by the
federal government in any contract or grant for
federal assistance.
(c) It is the purpose and intent of this section to
authorize the authority to do all things necessary to secure the
cooperation of and financial aid from the federal government for
any planning, design, development, construction, and maintenance
work that the authority is authorized to undertake pursuant to
this part.
§2OSE- District improvement and maintenance program.
Supplemental to the powers granted to the authority under
section 206E-4, the authority may establish a district
improvement and maintenance program to establish a mechanism to
improve and maintain the district and do all things necessary to
effectuate the establishment and operation of the district
improvement and maintenance program, including but not limited
to determining and assessing a service or regulatory fee in
accordance with applicable law. The authority may adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 91 to implement the program.
§2OSE- Banyan Drive community development district
special fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury
2026-2515 SB2001 CDl SMA-l.docx
lIRDUlllllllliilillOmill

Page 8 2001
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
the Banyan Drive corramunity development district special fund
into which shall be deposited:
(1) All revenues, income, and receipts of the authority
for the district, notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, including section 206E-16; provided that
revenues, income, and receipts derived from leases
shall be paid to the agency that owns or manages the
property;
(2) Moneys directed, allocated, or disbursed to the
district from government agencies or private
individuals or organizations, including grants, gifts,
awards, donations, and moneys collected from the
district improvement and maintenance program, for
costs to administer and operate the district; and
(3) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the legislature.
(b) Moneys in the fund shall be used only for the purposes
of this part.
(c) Investment earnings credited to the assets of the fund
shall become assets of the fund."
SECTION 3. Section 206E-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
2026-2515 SB2001 CDl SMA-l.docx
iiiiiiiiiiMnMiniiiniiiiiBHiii

Page 9
S.B. NO.
^1
C.D. 1
"(b) The authority shall consist of the director of
finance or the director's designee; the director of
transportation or the director's designee; the director of
business, economic development, and tourism or the director's
designee; the chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources; the director of planning or planning and permitting
of each county in which a community development district is
located or the director's designee; a cultural specialist; an
at-large member nominated by the president of the senate; an
at-large member nominated by the speaker of the house of
representatives; two representatives of the Heeia community
development district, comprising one resident of that district
or the Koolaupoko district, which consists of sections 1 through
9 of zone 4 of the first tax map key division, and one owner of
a small business or one officer or director of a nonprofit
organization in the Heeia community development district or
Koolaupoko district; two representatives of the Kalaeloa
community development district, comprising one resident of the
Ewa zone (zone 9, sections 1 through 2) or the Waianae zone
(zone 8, sections 1 through 9) of the first tax map key
division, and one owner of a small business or one officer or
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-I.docx 9
iiiiiiiiiiHiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiii

Page 10 S.B. NO. 25*1
C.D. 1
director of a nonprofit organization in the Ewa or Waianae zone;
two representatives of the Kakaako community development
district, comprising one resident of the district and one owner
of a small business or one officer or director of a nonprofit
organization in the district; two representatives of the
Pulehunui community development district, consisting of one
resident of the island of Maui, and one owner of a small
business or one officer or director of a nonprofit organization
on the island of Maui; [and,] the chairperson of the Banyan
Drive Hawaii redevelopment agency; two representatives of the
Banyan Drive community development district, consisting of one
resident of the Waiakea ahupuaa (zone 2, section 1, 2, or 4 of
the third tax map key division) , and one owner of a small
business or an officer or director of a nonprofit organization
located in the town of Hilo (zone 2, sections 1 through 5 of the
third tax map key division); for the purposes of part of
this chapter only, a lineal descendant of the Waiakea ahupuaa;
ar^ for the purposes of part X of this chapter only, two experts
on transit-oriented development, to be appointed one each by the
president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives; and the following ex officio, nonvoting
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx 10
iiiiHiiiiiiniimiNiiiHiiH

Page 11
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
members: the chairpersons of the respective senate and house of
representatives standing committees having jurisdiction over
transportation, and the chairpersons of the respective senate
and house of representatives standing committees having
jurisdiction over housing.
All members except the director of finance; director of
transportation; county directors of planning or planning and
permitting; director of business, economic development, and
tourism; chairperson of the board of land and natural resources;
the two experts on transit-oriented development appointed by the
president of the senate and speaker of the house of
representatives, respectively; the chairpersons of the
respective senate and house of representatives standing
committees having jurisdiction over transportation; the
chairpersons of the respective senate and house of
representatives standing committees having jurisdiction over
housing; ;yie chair£erson of the Banyan^riye HawaiJ^
redevelopment agency; or, where relevant, their respective
designees shall be appointed by the governor pursuant to section
26-34. The two at-large members nominated by the president of
the senate and speaker of the house of representatives shall
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx 1
liinMiMniiiiuiiiiniiiiiii

Page 12 2001
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
each be invited to serve and appointed by the governor from a
list of three nominees submitted for each position by the
nominating authority specified in this subsection.
The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall each submit a list of six nominees for
each district to the governor to fill the two district
representative positions for each community development
district. For each community development district, the governor
shall appoint one member from a list of nominees submitted by
the president of the senate and one member from a list of
nominees submitted by the speaker of the house of
representatives, and of the two appointees, one shall meet the
district residency requirement and one shall meet the district
small business owner or nonprofit organization officer or
director requirement.
The office of Hawaiian affairs shall submit a list of at
least three nominees to the governor to fill the lineal
descendant of the Waiakea ahupuaa position.
The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall each appoint a member having expertise and
experience in urban planning and community development to fill
2026-2515 SB2001 CDl SMA-l.docx 1

Page 13
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the two positions designated for experts on transit-oriented
development.
The authority shall be organized and shall exercise
jurisdiction as follows:
(1) For matters affecting the Heeia community development
district, the following members shall be considered i:
determining quorum and majority and shall be eligible
to vote:
(A) The director of finance or the director’s
designee;
(B) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
(C) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
(D) The director of planning and permitting for the
county in which the Heeia community development
district is located or the director's designee;
(E) The cultural specialist;
(F) The two at-large members; and
(G) The two representatives of the Heeia community
development district;
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx 13
iiiiiBiiiiiiiiiiHiwiniiiniii

Page 14 S.B. NO. SSi
C.D. 1
(2) For matters affecting the Kalaeloa community
development district, the following members shall be
considered in determining quorum and majority and
shall be eligible to vote:
(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;
(B) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
(C) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
(D) The director of planning and permitting for the
county in which the Kalaeloa community
development district is located or the director's
designee;
(E) The cultural specialist;
(F) The two at-large members; and
(G) The two representatives of the Kalaeloa community
development district;
(3) For matters affecting the Kakaako community
development district, the following members shall be
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx 14
iiiiiiMiHiinMiiiiiion

Page 15 2001
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
considered in determining quorum and majority and
shall be eligible to vote:
(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;
(B) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
(D) The director of planning and permitting for the
county in which the Kakaako community development
district is located or the director's designee;
(E) The cultural specialist;
(F) The two at-large members; and
(G) The two representatives of the Kakaako community
development district;
For matters affecting the Pulehunui community
development district, the following members shall be
considered in determining quorum and majority and
shall be eligible to vote:
(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx 15
iiiiniwiiiuiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 16
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(B) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
(C) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
(D) The director of planning for the county in which
the Pulehunui community development district is
located or the director's designee;
(E) The chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources or the chairperson's designee;
(F) The cultural specialist;
(G) The two at-large members; and
(H) The two representatives of the Pulehunui
community development district; [afid]
(5) For matters affecting part X of this chapter only, the
following members shall be considered in determining
quorum and majority and shall be eligible to vote:
(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;
(B) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx 16
IMIllWlliilMlillllilllll

Page 17
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(C) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
(D) The chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources or the chairperson's designee;
(E) The director of planning for the county in which
the program area is located or the director's
designee;
(F) The cultural specialist;
(G) The two at-large members; and
(H) The two experts on transit-oriented development
appointed by the president of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives[—]2 and
(6) For matters affecting the Banyan Drive community
development district, the following members shall be
considered in determining quorum and majority and
shall be eligible to vote:
(A) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
The director of finance or the director's
designee;
2026-2515 SB2001 GDI SMA-l.docx 17
UIIIIIIIHiniMlllliillllil

Page 18
S.B. NO.
-1
C.D. 1
(C) The chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources or the chairperson's designee;
(D) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
(E) The director of planning for the county in which
the Banyan Drive community development district
is located or the director's designee;
(F) The chairperson of the Banyan Drive Hawaii
redevelopment agency or the chairperson's
designee;
The cultural specialist;
(H) The two at-large members;
(I) A lineal descendant of the Waiakea ahupuaa; and
(J) The two representatives of the Banyan Drive
community development district;
[In the—event of] If a vacancy[—] occurs, a member shall be
appointed to fill the vacancy in the same manner as the original
appointment within thirty days of the vacancy or within ten days
of the senate's rejection of a previous appointment, as
applicable.
2026-2515 SB2001 CDl SMA-l.docx 18

Page 19 2001
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
The terms of the director of finance; director of
transportation; county directors of planning and permitting;
director of business, economic development, and tourism; [end]
chairperson of the board of land and natural resources; ar^
chairperson of the Banyan Drive Hawaii redevelopment agency; or
their respective designees shall run concurrently with each
official's term of office. The terms of the appointed voting
members shall be for four years, commencing on July 1 and
expiring on June 30. The governor shall provide for staggered
terms of the initially appointed voting members so that the
initial terms of four members selected by lot shall be for two
years, the initial terms of four members selected by lot shall
be for three years, and the initial terras of the reraaining three
merabers shall be for four years. The terras on the authority of
the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives
standing coraraittees having jurisdiction over housing and the
chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives standing
committees having jurisdiction over transportation shall run
concurrently with that respective legislator's term as the
chairperson of that respective committee.
2026-2515 SB2001 CDl SMA-l.docx 19
IIIMIMIIIIIHIIIIMIIHiillili

Page 20
S.B. NO.
* • h.D. 2
C.D. 1
The governor may remove or suspend for cause any member
after due notice and public hearing.
Notwithstanding section 92-15, a majority of all eligible
voting members as specified in this subsection shall constitute
a quorum to do business, and the concurrence of a majority of
all eligible voting members as specified in this subsection
shall be necessary to make any action of the authority valid.
All members shall continue in office until their respective
successors have been appointed and qualified. Except as herein
provided, no member appointed under this subsection shall be an
officer or employee of the State or its political subdivisions.
For the purposes of this section, "small business" means a
business that is independently owned and that is not dominant in
its field of operation."
SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
Hawaii community development authority to implement this Act and
to:
(1) Draft and adopt rules under chapter 91, Hawaii Revised
Statutes; and
2026-2515 SB2001 CDl SMA-l.docx 20
iHiiiiiiiiiininiiiiBiiiiiu

Page 21
S.B. NO. s” ’
C.D. 1
(2) Perform an environmental assessment or environmental
impact statement under chapter 343, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, for any property within the Banyan Drive
community development district.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii
community development authority for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $250,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for
deposit into the Banyan Drive community development district
special fund.
SECTION 6. There is appropriated out of the Banyan Drive
community development district special fund the sum of $250,000
or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027
to be used for the purposes of the Banyan Drive community
development district special fund.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii
community development authority for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 7. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $125,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
2026-2515 SB2001 CDl SMA-l.docx 2
liiHiiiiHiiiiiiDiiiiniiiniHi

Page 22
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) position
within the Hawaii community development authority.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii
community development authority for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 8. This Act shall be liberally construed in order
to accomplish the purposes set forth herein. If any provision
of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect
other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given
effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this
end the provisions of this Act are severable.
SECTION 9. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 10. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2515 SB2001 CDl SMA-l.docx 22
iiiriiiiiniiiniHiiiiininMiiiii

S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 8th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 2001, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
213-26

SB No. 2001, SD 1,HD2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives